Florida, session 2026, HB935.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Subsection (30) is added section 409.906,
Florida Statutes, to read:
409.906 Optional Medicaid services.—Subject to specific
appropriations, the agency may make payments for services which
are optional to the state under Title XIX of the Social Security
Act and are furnished by Medicaid providers to recipients who
are determined to be eligible on the dates on which the services
Page 1 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb935-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 935 2026
were provided. Any optional service that is provided shall be
provided only when medically necessary and in accordance with
state and federal law. Optional services rendered by providers
in mobile units to Medicaid recipients may be restricted or
prohibited by the agency. Nothing in this section shall be
construed to prevent or limit the agency from adjusting fees,
reimbursement rates, lengths of stay, number of visits, or
number of services, or making any other adjustments necessary to
comply with the availability of moneys and any limitations or
directions provided for in the General Appropriations Act or
chapter 216. If necessary to safeguard the state's systems of
providing services to elderly and disabled persons and subject
to the notice and review provisions of s. 216.177, the Governor
may direct the Agency for Health Care Administration to amend
the Medicaid state plan to delete the optional Medicaid service
known as "Intermediate Care Facilities for the Developmentally
Disabled." Optional services may include:
(30) COMMUNITY HEALTH WORKERS.—The agency may pay for the
provision of community health worker services including, but not
limited to, health promotion, wellness coaching, and self-
management education; cultural mediation; interpretation or
translation services; health system navigation; patient and
family advocacy; outreach before appointments, including
appointment reminders; outreach to ensure adherence to
treatments and medications; home visits; individual, community,
Page 2 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb935-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 935 2026
and environmental assessments; arranging transportation; making
connections to community resources or social services; and
providing care coordination and case management.
(a) As used in this subsection, the term "community health
worker" means a frontline public health worker who provides a
range of services addressing the health and social needs of the
community and is a trusted member of or has a close
understanding of the community he or she serves. The term
includes community health representatives, promotores de salud,
and public or private community-based organizations.
(b) The agency shall adopt rules that include, but are not
limited to, eligible services provided by community health
workers.
(c) The agency may seek federal approval necessary to
implement this subsection.
Section 2. Paragraphs (c) through (u) of subsection (3) of
section 409.908, Florida Statutes, are redesignated as
paragraphs (d) through (v), respectively, and a new paragraph
(c) is added to subsection (3) of that section, to read:
409.908 Reimbursement of Medicaid providers.—Subject to
specific appropriations, the agency shall reimburse Medicaid
providers, in accordance with state and federal law, according
to methodologies set forth in the rules of the agency and in
policy manuals and handbooks incorporated by reference therein.
These methodologies may include fee schedules, reimbursement
Page 3 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb935-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 935 2026
methods based on cost reporting, negotiated fees, competitive
bidding pursuant to s. 287.057, and other mechanisms the agency
considers efficient and effective for purchasing services or
goods on behalf of recipients. If a provider is reimbursed based
on cost reporting and submits a cost report late and that cost
report would have been used to set a lower reimbursement rate
for a rate semester, then the provider's rate for that semester
shall be retroactively calculated using the new cost report, and
full payment at the recalculated rate shall be effected
retroactively. Medicare-granted extensions for filing cost
reports, if applicable, shall also apply to Medicaid cost
reports. Payment for Medicaid compensable services made on
behalf of Medicaid-eligible persons is subject to the
availability of moneys and any limitations or directions
provided for in the General Appropriations Act or chapter 216.
Further, nothing in this section shall be construed to prevent
or limit the agency from adjusting fees, reimbursement rates,
lengths of stay, number of visits, or number of services, or
making any other adjustments necessary to comply with the
availability of moneys and any limitations or directions
provided for in the General Appropriations Act, provided the
adjustment is consistent with legislative intent.
(3) Subject to any limitations or directions provided for
in the General Appropriations Act, the following Medicaid
100 services and goods may be reimbursed on a fee-for-service basis.
Page 4 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb935-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 935 2026
101 For each allowable service or goods furnished in accordance with
102 Medicaid rules, policy manuals, handbooks, and state and federal
103 law, the payment shall be the amount billed by the provider, the
104 provider's usual and customary charge, or the maximum allowable
105 fee established by the agency, whichever amount is less, with
106 the exception of those services or goods for which the agency
107 makes payment using a methodology based on capitation rates,
108 average costs, or negotiated fees.
109 (c) Community health workers services.
110 Section 3. Paragraphs (e) through (cc) of subsection (1)
111 of section 409.973, Florida Statutes, are redesignated as
112 paragraphs (f) through (dd), respectively, and a new paragraph
113 (e) is added to subsection (1) of that section, to read:
114 409.973 Benefits.—
115 (1) MINIMUM BENEFITS.—Managed care plans shall cover, at a
116 minimum, the following services:
117 (e) Community health worker services.
118 Section 4. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 5 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb935-00